Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2031.02
Retirement system; current employee; participation in another governmental plan; how treated.

For one year after September 9, 1995, any member employed on or before September 9, 1995, may apply to the board for eligibility and vesting credit for years of participation in another Nebraska governmental plan, as defined by section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code. Such credit shall be used toward the vesting percentage pursuant to subsection (2) of section 81-2031 but shall not be included as years of service in the benefit calculation.

Laws 1995, LB 501, § 9.